Illinois, session 104th, HB6.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Blight 5Mitigation Act. 6    Section 5. Right of possession.7    (a) A property owner that lives within one-fourth of a 8mile of and on the same street as residential real property 9that has been abandoned may, after the property has been 10continuously abandoned for 12 months, petition the court for 11title to the land.12    (b) The court shall order that title to the real property 13be transferred to the petitioner if the petitioner presents 14clear and convincing evidence that:15        (1) the property is abandoned;16        (2) the owner of the property has been made a party to 17    the action in accordance with the Code of Civil Procedure 18    and court rules; and19        (3) the property is not:20                (i) listed for sale on a multiple listing 21        service;22                (ii) being maintained in receivership status; 23        or  HB0006- 2 -LRB104 03377 JRC 13399 b1                (iii) under contract for sale.2    (c) As used in this Act, "abandoned" means:3        (1) the property has been tax delinquent for 2 or more 4    years; and5        (2) the property is unoccupied by persons legally in 6    possession. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.